District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Certificate of Need Improvement Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Health Services Planning Program Re-establishment Act of 1996, effective
April 9, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-191; D.C. Official Code § 44-401 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 44-401) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended as follows:
(I) Strike the phrase “$6 million” and insert the phrase “$15
million” in its place.
(II) Strike the phrase “SHPDA may, by rule, adjust this
threshold annually to reflect the change in the Hospital Construction Cost Index issued by the
U.S. Department of Commerce;” and insert the phrase “SHPDA shall, by rule, adjust this
threshold every 2 years to reflect the change in the Producer Price Index for New Health Care
Building Construction issued by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics or a comparable
index;” in its place.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended as follows:
(I) Strike the phrase “$3.5 million” and insert the phrase
“$5 million” in its place.
(II) Strike the phrase “SHPDA may, by rule, adjust this
threshold annually to reflect the change in the Hospital Construction Cost Index issued by the
U.S. Department of Commerce;” and insert the phrase “SHPDA shall, by rule, adjust this
threshold every 2 years to reflect the change in the Producer Price Index for New Health Care
Building Construction issued by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics or a comparable
index;” in its place.
(iii) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the phrase
“equipment;” and inserting the phrase “equipment; except, for the replacement of existing major
medical equipment with new equipment intended for the same purpose;” in its place.
(B) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:
“(C) The term “capital expenditure” shall not include an expenditure on a
nonpatient care project or renovations of existing facilities that do not increase or decrease the
number of licensed beds or types of services provided by the facility.”.
(2) Paragraph (6B)(B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B) The term “diagnostic health care facility” shall not include any
facility that would be exempt from the definition of health care facility under paragraph (10) of
this section.”.
(3) A new paragraph (9B) are added to read as follows:
“(9B)(A) “Group practice” means a group of 2 or more health professionals
legally organized as a partnership, professional corporation, foundation, not-for-profit
corporation, faculty practice plan, or similar association authorized to do business in the District
of Columbia, for which:
“(i) Each health professional who is a member of the group is
licensed to practice in the District of Columbia and provides substantially the full range of
services that a health professional with that license routinely provides, including medical care,
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
consultation, diagnosis, or treatment, through the joint use of shared office space, facilities,
equipment and personnel;
“(ii) Substantially all of the services of the health professionals
who are members of the group are provided through the group and are billed under a billing
number assigned to the group and amounts so received are treated as receipts of the group;
“(iii) The overhead expenses of, and the income generated from,
the practice are distributed in accordance with methods previously determined by group
members;
“(iv) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this pararaph, no
health professional who is a member of the group directly or indirectly receives compensation
based on the volume or value of referrals made by the health professional; and
“(v) Members of the group personally conduct no less than 75
percent of the physician-patient encounters of the group practice.
“(B) A health professional in a group practice may be paid a share of
overall profits of the group, or a productivity bonus based on services personally performed or
services incident to such personally performed services, so long as the share or bonus is not
determined in any manner which is directly related to the volume or value of referrals made by
such health professional.
“(C) In the case of a faculty practice plan associated with a hospital,
institution of higher education, or medical school with an approved medical residency training
program in which health professional members may provide a variety of different specialty
services and provide professional services both within and outside the group, as well as perform
other tasks such as research, subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall apply only with respect to
the services provided within the faculty practice plan.”.
(4) Paragraph (10) is amended to read as follows:
“(10)(A) “Health care facility” or “HCF” means any private general hospital,
psychiatric hospital, other specialty hospital, rehabilitation facility, skilled nursing facility,
intermediate care facility, freestanding emergency department, urgent care facility, ambulatory
surgical facility with at least one operating room, kidney disease treatment center, freestanding
hemodialysis facility, diagnostic health care facility, home health agency, hospice, or other
comparable health care facility which has an annual operating budget of at least $500,000.
“(B) The term “health care facility” shall not include:
“(i) A private office facility, clinic, or other establishment with no
operating room where one or more health professionals provide primary care services, specialty
care services, or dental services according to the applicable scope of practice of the health
professional’s licensure;
“(ii) A virtual provider network or virtual telehealth platform;
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(iii) A facility providing outpatient or residential behavioral
health services subject to the exclusive regulatory authority of the Department of Behavioral
Health;
“(iv) A federally qualified health center, as defined in section
1861(aa)(4) of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 313; 42 U.S.C. §
1395x(aa)(4)), or an entity that has been determined by the Health Resources and Services
Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to meet the
definition of a federally qualified health center, but does not receive funding under section 330 of
the Public Health Service Act, approved October 11, 1996 (110 Stat. 3626; 42 U.S.C. § 254b)
(“federally qualified health center look-alike”); or
“(v) A health care facility licensed or to be licensed as a
community residence facility, except for an intermediate care facility, or an Assisted Living
Residence as defined by section 201(4) of the Assisted Living Residence Regulatory Act of
2000, effective June 24, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-127; D.C. Official Code § 44-102.01(4)).”.
(5) Paragraph (12) is amended by striking the phrase “those outpatient behavioral
health services subject to the exclusive regulatory authority of the Department of Behavioral
Health and services provided by physicians, dentists, HMOs, and other individual providers in
individual or group practice.” and inserting the phrase “any service provided by an entity that
would be exempt from the definition of health care facility under paragraph (10) of this section.”
in its place.
(6) Paragraph (14)(A) is amended as follows:
(A) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended by striking the phrase “SHPDA may,
by rule, adjust this threshold annually to reflect the change in the Consumer Price Index issued
by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor;” and inserting the phrase
“SHPDA shall, by rule, adjust this threshold every 2 years to reflect the change in the Producer
Price Index for Medical Equipment and Supplies Manufacturing issued by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics or such comparable index;” in its place.
(B) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended by striking the phrase “$2 million;”
and inserting the phrase “$2 million; except, that the SHPDA shall, by rule, adjust this threshold
every 2 years to reflect the change in the Producer Price Index for Medical Equipment and
Supplies Manufacturing issued by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics or such
comparable index;” in its place.
(C) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the phrase “$350,000.”
and inserting the phrase “$350,000; except, that the SHPDA shall, by rule, adjust this threshold
every 2 years to reflect the change in the Producer Price Index for Medical Equipment and
Supplies Manufacturing issued by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics or such
comparable index.”.
(7) Paragraph (15) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended as follows:
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(i) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended to read as follows:
“(iii) Any new health service with a physical location; or”.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended by striking the phrase “or
10%” and inserting the phrase “or 20%” in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “SHPDA may, by
rule, adjust this threshold annually to reflect the change in the medical care component of the
Consumer Price Index issued by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, U.S. Department of Labor,” and
inserting the phrase “SHPDA shall, by rule, adjust this threshold every 2 years to reflect the
change in the medical care component of the Consumer Price Index issued by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics, U.S. Department of Labor or a comparable index,” in its place.
(8) A new paragraph (15A) is added to read as follows:
“(15A) “Nonpatient care project” means any capital project by a healthcare
facility or a hospital that does not solely, directly or indirectly, impact clinical procedures,
treatments, patient interactions, or clinical areas, such as the construction or renovation of
administrative offices, purchase of non-medical equipment, such as office furniture or
information technology systems, including electronic medical records, renovation or replacement
of electrical, heating, cooling, ventilation systems, elevator and escalators or other means of
ingress and egress, or fire and life safety systems, and other projects that are focused solely on
supporting the administrative functions of the facility.”.
(9) Paragraph (20) is amended by striking the phrase “rendered to patients” and
inserting the phrase “rendered to a patient, regardless of the patient’s residency,” in its place.
(10) New paragraphs (21) and (22) are added to read as follows:
“(21) “Virtual provider network” means a provider-owned and managed entity
which employs or contracts with licensed health care providers, and which exclusively provides
telehealth or telemedicine health care services through a virtual telehealth platform. The term
“virtual provider network” shall not include an entity that maintains a physical facility, office, or
other similar location in any jurisdiction where a person may go to seek care in person.
“(22) “Virtual telehealth platform” means a digital-only telehealth or telemedicine
entity which facilitates the ability of patients to access licensed health care providers by
exclusively providing health care services through a virtual provider network. The term “virtual
telehealth platform” shall not include an entity that maintains a physical facility, office, or other
similar location in any jurisdiction where a person may go to seek care in person.”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 44-402) is amended by repealing subsection (b-1).
(c) Section 4(c) (D.C. Official Code § 44-403(c)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “Two representatives of
incorporated associations of health care facilities in the District;” and inserting the phrase “One
representative of an incorporated association of health care facilities in the District;” in its place.
(2) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3A) One representative of an incorporated association of hospitals in the
District;”.
(d) Section 8(b) (D.C. Official Code § 44-407(b)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraphs (3) and (14) are repealed.
(2) Paragraph (19) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(3) Paragraph (20) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(4) A new paragraph (21) is added to read as follows:
“(21) Any proposal by a virtual telehealth platform or virtual provider network to
provide access to, offer, or develop health care services exclusively via a virtual telehealth
platform to District residents.”.
(e) Section 9(b) (D.C. Official Code § 44-408(b)) is amended by striking the phrase “no
more than 3 years old.” and inserting the phrase “no more than 5 years old.” in its place.
(f) Section 10(f) (D.C. Official Code § 44-409(f)) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing language is designated as paragraph (1).
(2) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) The Department shall post on its website a list of complete certificate of need
applications received by the SHPDA in the previous 3 years, including the name of the applicant,
a brief description of the proposed new health care entity or service, and the SHPDA’s
determination regarding the application.”.
(g) Section 12(a) (D.C. Official Code § 44-411(a)) is amended by striking the phrase “;
except that no certificate of need shall be effective for more than 3 years from the original date of
issuance.” and inserting a period in its place.
(h) Section 21(c) (D.C. Official Code § 44-420(c)) is repealed.
Sec. 3. Clarifying and technical amendments.
(a) The Health-Care and Community Residence Facility Hospice and Home Care
Licensure Act of 1983, effective February 24, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-48; D.C. Official Code § 44-
501 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(1) A new section 3a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. Registration of certain health care entities.
“(a) The Director of the Department of Health (“Department”) shall create a registration
process for the following entities:
“(1) A private office facility, clinic, or other establishment with no operating
room where a health professional or group of health professionals provide primary care services,
specialty care services, or dental services according to the applicable scope of practice of the
health professional’s licensure;
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) A virtual provider network or virtual telehealth platform operating in the
District; and
“(3) A federally qualified health center, as defined in section 1861(aa)(4) of the
Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 313; 42 U.S.C. § 1395x(aa)(4)), or an
entity that has been determined by the Health Resources and Services Administration of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services to meet the definition of a federally
qualified health center, but does not receive funding under section 330 of the Public Health
Service Act, approved October 11, 1996 (110 Stat. 3626; 42 U.S.C. § 254b) (“federally qualified
health center look-alike”).
“(b) The registration process shall:
“(1) Take less than a median of 10 business days for the Department to review
and approve once a completed application has been submitted, unless the Department notifies the
applicant of an issue;
“(2) Require that the facility submit to the Department only information that is
accessible and reasonable, such as its physical location, names of providers, provider capacity,
and types of insurance accepted;
“(3) Not require registration renewal more frequently than every 3 years; and
“(4) Not require a registration or renewal fee above $100 per year of registration;
provided, that the Department may adjust this fee periodically to reflect the change in the
Consumer Price Index issued by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of
Labor through rulemaking.
“(c) A new entity that meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section shall
register with the Department before beginning operation.
“(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, existing entities that meet the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section for registration shall have 2 years from the
effective date of this section to complete the registration process.
“(e) Entities that own or operate more than one physical location shall complete the
registration process for each location separately.
“(f) The revenue generated from the registration or renewal fees under subsection (b) of
this section shall be placed in the Health Occupations Regulation Fund, established by section
4904 of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001, effective October 3, 2001
(D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 7-733).”.
(2) Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 44-504) is amended as follows:
(A) Subsection (a)(2)(A) is amended by striking the word “licenses” and
inserting the phrase “licenses and registrations” in its place.
(B) Subsection (j) is amended by striking the phrase “rules that establish
or modify license fees” and inserting the phrase “rules that establish or modify license or
registration fees” in its place.
(3) Section 10 (D.C. Official Code § 44-509) is amended as follows:
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(A) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “or other entity from
operating a facility or agency” and inserting the phrase “entity described in section 3a, or other
entity from operating a facility or agency” in its place.
(B) Subsection (e)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “a facility or
agency” and inserting the phrase “an entity described in section 3a or a facility or agency” in its
place.
(b) Section 4931(3) of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001,
effective January 25, 2014 (D.C. Law 20-63; D.C. Official Code § 7-742.01(3)), is amended by
striking the phrase “through direct, retail, and online sales,” and inserting the phrase “through
direct, retail, wholesale to licensed food establishments, and online sales,” in its place.
(c) The District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective March
25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(1) The table of contents is amended by striking the phrase “Sec. 224. Board of
Integrative Healthcare.” and inserting the phrase “Sec. 224. Board of Acupuncture, Chiropractic,
and Naturopathic Physicians.” in its place.
(2) Section 101(1) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01(1)) is amended by striking the
phrase “Integrative Healthcare” and inserting the phrase “Acupuncture, Chiropractic, and
Naturopathic Physicians” in its place.
(3) Section 203(a)(2A) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.03(a)(2A)) is amended by
striking the phrase “Integrative Healthcare” and inserting the phrase “Acupuncture, Chiropractic,
and Naturopathic Physicians” in its place.
(4) Section 216(f) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.16(f)) is amended by striking the
phrase “Integrative Healthcare” and inserting the phrase “Acupuncture, Chiropractic, and
Naturopathic Physicians” in its place.
(5) Section 224 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1202.24) is amended as follows:
(A) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “Integrative
Healthcare” and inserting the phrase “Acupuncture, Chiropractic, and Naturopathic Physicians”
in its place.
(B) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Integrative
Healthcare to consist of 9 members” and inserting the phrase “Acupuncture, Chiropractic, and
Naturopathic Physicians to consist of 7 members” in its place.
(C) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Of the members of the Board, 2 shall be acupuncturists licensed in the District, 2
shall be doctors of chiropractic licensed in the District, 2 shall be naturopathic physicians
licensed in the District, and one shall be a consumer member.”.
(D) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “Of the members
initially appointed under this section, 3 shall be appointed for a term of one year, 3 shall be
appointed for a term of 2 years, and 3 shall be appointed for a term of 3 years.” and inserting the
phrase “Of the members initially appointed under this section, 2 shall be appointed for a term of
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
one year, 2 shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 3 shall be appointed for a term of 3
years.” in its place.
(E) Subection (f) is amended as follows:
(i) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the semicolon and
inserting the phrase “; and” in its place.
(ii) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
(6) Section 504 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.04) is amended by striking the
phrase “Integrative Healthcare” wherever it appears and inserting the phrase “Acupuncture,
Chiropractic, and Naturopathic Physicians” in its place.
(7) Section 506 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.06) is amended by adding a new
subsection (f) to read as follows:
“(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the examination requirement
under this section shall not apply to an individual applying for licensure as a licensed graduate
social worker under section 802.”.
(8) Section 621 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1206.21) is amended by striking the
phrase “Integrative Healthcare” wherever it appears and inserting the phrase “Acupuncture,
Chiropractic, and Naturopathic Physicians” in its place.
(9) Section 802 (D.C. Official Code § 3-1208.02) is amended as follows:
(A) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) The Board of Social Work shall license as a graduate social worker a person who, in
addition to meeting the requirements of title V, except the examination requirement under
section 506, has a master’s degree or a doctorate from a social work program accredited by the
Council on Social Work Education.”.
(B) A new subsection (c) is added to read as follows:
“(c) To renew their license as a licensed graduate social worker, a person shall, prior to
the first time renewing their license, either:
“(1) Pass a national examination or
“(2) Obtain 1,500 hours in the practice of social work under the supervision of a
social worker licensed under sections 803 or 804.”.
(d) Section 2(f)(73) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law
2-142; D.C. Code § 1-523.01(f)(73)) is amended by striking the phrase “Integrative Healthcare”
and inserting the phrase “Acupuncture, Chiropractic, and Naturopathic Physicians” in its place.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
(a) Sections 2 and 3(a) shall apply upon the date of inclusion of their fiscal effect in an
approved budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provisions identified in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
10